analyzer.yavuz.lexc
! analyzer.lexc
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!




Multichar_Symbols ^A ^I ^K ^C ^c ^p ^k ^D ^t ^g ^G
                  ^(A) ^(I) ^(s) ^(n) ^(y) ^(ş)
                  ^pA ^pI ^pO ^pU ^pÂ ^pÔ ^pÛ ^pÎ
                  @RB @MB @dB
                  @ABBR
                  @M @MREDUP
                  @tSep @dSep
                  @RomNum
                  @NCOMP
                  @PRN
                  @DEL@ @DUP@ @DELS@
                  @LN @LN2 @CAUS
                  @miSPC @opt3
                  ^NS ^NNS ^S
                  ^sFUV ^sFRV ^sBUV ^sBRV ^sVC ^sUC
!                   e,i   ü,ö   a,ı   o,u   

LEXICON Ncomp ! this is only for lexicalized forms with compounding
@NCOMP%<N%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@RB NcompCont;
@NCOMP%<N%:mredup%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@MREDUP@RB NcompCont;


LEXICON NcompCont
            ENDLEX;
            NcompAposCont;

LEXICON NcompAposCont
                Ninfl;

LEXICON Ninfl
                Ncase;



LEXICON N
%<N%>:@RB       Ncont;

LEXICON Ncont
    NcompCont; ! includes final



LEXICON  NCaseNoGen
%<acc%>:^(y)^I@MB   AccCaseCont;

LEXICON  Ncase
                    NCaseNoGen;                    

LEXICON Case1Cont
            ENDLEX;

!
! Normally, predicative use after accusative is almost an
! impossibility, but some forms exist: `renginiyse Ali seçmiş', 
!
LEXICON AccCaseCont
             Case1Cont;
!            ENDLEX;

LEXICON ENDLEX #;

LEXICON Root 
köyişler              Ncomp;
başkanvekil           Ncomp;
acımı^k               N;
aforizm               N;
ağustosböce^k         Ncomp;
ahitname              N;
akıbet                N;
aks                   N;
alaz                  N;
alpaks                N;
amilaz                N;
ana% dil              Ncomp;
anadil                Ncomp;
anekdot               N;
antilo^p              N;
aracı                 N;
arkeopteriks          N;
asa^p                 N;
asma                  N;
atasöz                Ncomp;
atlıkarınca           N;
aybaş                 Ncomp;
ayçiçe^k              Ncomp;
ayçiçek% yağ          Ncomp;
ayçöre^k              Ncomp;
aydınlıkölçer         N;
ayışı^k               Ncomp;
akşam% üst            Ncomp; 
akşamüst              Ncomp; 
azotometre            N;
bahşiş                N;
balisti^k             N;
balkaba^k             Ncomp;
balmum                Ncomp;
barda^k               N;
başhostes             N;
başrejisör            N;
bayır                 N;
belirlenim            N;
besleme               N;
bıçakçı               N;
bıngılda^k            N;
biraev                Ncomp;
blokaj                N;
boncu^k               N;
boyunbağ              Ncomp;
bozmacı               N;
büküntü               N;
buu^t                 N;
buzdola^p             Ncomp;
çakırkana^t           N;
can% dost             Ncomp;
candost               Ncomp;
çapla                 N;
cayırtı               N;
çelen^k               N;
cem% ev               Ncomp;
ceryan                N;    ! common unofficial (mis)spelling
cezaev                Ncomp;
çıdam                 N;
cilben^t              N;
cırboğa               N;
cızı^k                N;
coşku                 N;
cumhurbaşkan          Ncomp;
cüz                   N;
daraban               N;
değişke               N;
demiryol              Ncomp;
deneyüstücülü^k       N;
dere% ot              Ncomp;
dereot                Ncomp;
devekuş               Ncomp; 
dikel                 N;
diş% et               Ncomp;
dişet                 Ncomp;
dış% işler            Ncomp;
dışişler              Ncomp;
diş% macun            Ncomp;
dişmacun              Ncomp;
diyar                 N;
doğumgün              Ncomp;
doğum% günü           Ncomp;
doru^k                N;
düzene^k              N;
ˈekseriyet             N;
elbez                 Ncomp;
el% yazma             Ncomp;
elyazma               Ncomp;
endam                 N;
eşe^k                 N;
evsahi^p              Ncomp;
facia                 N;
faltaş                Ncomp;
feodalizm             N;
fildiş                Ncomp;
fırın                 N;
fosil                 N;
gamet                 N;
gazoca^k              Ncomp;
gaz% yağ              Ncomp;
gazyağ                Ncomp;
gecek% yarı           Ncomp;
geceyarı              Ncomp;
gensoru               N;
göbek% taş            Ncomp;
göbektaş              Ncomp;
gök% cisi@DEL@m       Ncomp;
gökcisi@DEL@m         Ncomp;
gök% kuşa^k           Ncomp;
gökkuşa^k             Ncomp;
gökkuzgun             N;
gök% taş              Ncomp;
göktaş                Ncomp;
göz% alt              Ncomp;
gözalt                Ncomp;
gözbebe^k             Ncomp;
göz% kapa^k           Ncomp;
gözkapa^k             Ncomp;
gözlemev              Ncomp;
gözön                 Ncomp;
gözu^c                Ncomp;
gözyaş                Ncomp;
guatr                 N;
güçbirli^k            Ncomp;
gül% su               Ncomp;
gülsu                 Ncomp;
gül% yağ              Ncomp;
gülyağ                Ncomp;
gün% batım            Ncomp; 
günbatım              Ncomp; 
gün% boy              Ncomp;  ! ??Adv
günboy                Ncomp;  ! ??Adv
gün% ışı^k            Ncomp;
günışı^k              Ncomp;
güvenoylama           Ncomp;
güvenoy               Ncomp;
içgüvey               Ncomp;
hafiye                N;
hafta% son            Ncomp;
haftason              Ncomp;
hanımel               Ncomp;
harım                 N;
havaalan              Ncomp;
havagaz               Ncomp;
havaliman             Ncomp;
havayol               Ncomp;
hektogram             N;
hil^pAt               N;
hükü@DEL@m            N;
huzur% ev             Ncomp;
huzurev               Ncomp;
iç% tüzük             Ncomp;
içtüzük               Ncomp;
idman                 N;
ilân                  N;    ! common typo
infirak               N;
insanoğu@DEL@l        Ncomp;
ipu^c                 Ncomp;
işadam                Ncomp;
isale                 N;
işbaş                 Ncomp;
işbirli^k             Ncomp;
iş% bölüm             Ncomp;
işbölüm               Ncomp;
işgü^c                Ncomp;
iş% gün               Ncomp;
işgün                 Ncomp;
işletim% sistem       Ncomp;
istiba^t              N;
işyer                 Ncomp;
itmam                 N;
kabala^k              N;
kafatas               Ncomp;
kaleska               N;
kamu% oy              Ncomp;
kamuoy                Ncomp;
kaolin                N;
kapı% kul             Ncomp;
kapıkul               Ncomp;
karate                N;
karayol               Ncomp;
kâse                  N;
kayınpeder            N;
kendirgiller          N;
kıkırtı               N;
kireçtaş              Ncomp;
kırtasiye             N;
kitabev               Ncomp;
klor                  N;
komedyen              N;
konukev               Ncomp;
köpekgiller           N;
kozmonot              N;
külliye               N;
kuşdili               N;
kuyruk% sokum         Ncomp;
lapˈinagiller          N;
linotip               N;
magazin               N;
malvarlı^k            Ncomp;
mancˈana               N;
maslahatgüzar         N;
mekanizasyon          N;
mesel                 N;
mˈidyeci               N;
milet% vekil          Ncomp;
miletvekil            Ncomp;
milletvekil           Ncomp;
miyom                 N;
mucir                 N;
mulaj                 N;
müsteza^t             N;
narkozitör            N;
nihaven^t             N;
oftalmolo^g           N;
önkoşul               N;
ordu% ev               Ncomp;
orduev                Ncomp;
osuru^k               N;
oybirli^k             Ncomp;
oyçoklu^k             Ncomp;
palabıyık             N;
parmıcan              N;
pena                  N;
pipet                 N;
poliklini^k           N;
prosedür              N;
rahne                 N;
randevuev             Ncomp;
renyum                N;
rˈoza                  N;
şaheser               N;
şˈamar                 N;
şarapev               Ncomp;
sarığıburma           N;
sebze                 N;
semazen               N;
semiz% ot             Ncomp;
sesyayar              N;
silahhane             N;
şirk                  N;
sökün                 N;
spir^pAl              N;
sülfür                N;
sutop                 Ncomp;
süyüm                 N;
tahterevalli          N;
tansı^k               N;
tavzif                N;
tefsir                N;
temayül               N;
terkibiben^t          N;
teverrüm              N;
titremleme            N;
trˈampa                N;
türbin                N;
uçuç% böce^k          Ncomp;
umu^t                 N;
vadi                  N;
verese                N;
yabantıra^k           N;
yanıbaş               Ncomp;
yaşıt                 N;
yerbilim              Ncomp;
yerkabu^k             Ncomp;
yılan                 N;
yıl% dönüm            Ncomp; 
yıl% son              Ncomp; 
yüzölçüm              Ncomp;
zade                  N;
zeytinyağ             Ncomp;
zınk                  N;
aşev                  Ncomp;
başağrı               Ncomp;
belkemi^k             Ncomp;
denizana              Ncomp;
dolumev               Ncomp;
hamamböce^k           Ncomp;
kesekâğı^t            Ncomp;
mˈodaev                Ncomp;
tavukgöğü@DEL@s       Ncomp;
bor^c                 N;
içiş                  Ncomp;    ! mainly içişleri
bilinçalt             Ncomp;
doğumev               Ncomp;
gökgürültü            Ncomp;
seribaş               Ncomp;
ofsayt                N;
bilimadam             Ncomp;
kesekağı^t            Ncomp;
üçkağı^t              N;
